Maryland, session 2025, SB0490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Occupations and Professions
2–201.
There is a State Board of Public Accountancy in the Department.
2–202.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) a citizen of the United States; and
(2)] a resident of the State.
3–201.
There is a State Board of Architects in the Department.
3–202.

SENATE BILL 490
(b) Each member of the Board shall be a resident [and citizen] of the State.
5–201.
There is a State Board of Cosmetologists in the Department.
5–202.
(b) Each cosmetologist member of the Board:
(1) shall have practiced cosmetology actively for at least 5 years before
appointment;
(2) shall be a [citizen] RESIDENT of the State;
(3) may not be affiliated directly or indirectly with any cosmetology school;
(4) may not be affiliated with any person who manufactures or sells any
article, supply, or merchandise that is commonly used in a beauty salon; and
(5) may not be a graduate of the same school of cosmetology as any other
member of the Board.
6–201.
There is a State Board of Electricians in the Department.
6–202.
(b) Each member of the State Board shall be a [citizen and] resident of the State.
6.5–201.
There is a State Board of Stationary Engineers in the Department.
6.5–202.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) a citizen of the United States; and
(2)] a resident of the State.
7–201.
There is a State Board of Foresters in the Department.

SENATE BILL 490 7
7–202.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) a citizen of the United States; and
(2)] a resident of the State for at least 3 years.
8–201.
There is a State Board of Certified Interior Designers in the Department.
8–202.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be a resident [and citizen] of the State.
14–201.
There is a State Board for Professional Engineers in the Department.
14–202.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) a citizen of the United States; and
(2)] a resident of the State.
16–201.
There is a State Commission of Real Estate Appraisers, Appraisal Management
Companies, and Home Inspectors in the Department.
16–202.
(b) Each member of the Commission shall be a [citizen] RESIDENT of the State.
17–201.
There is a State Real Estate Commission in the Department.
17–202.
(b) Each member of the Commission shall be a [citizen] RESIDENT of the State.

SENATE BILL 490
21–201.
There is a State Board of Individual Tax Preparers in the Department.
21–202.
(b) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) a citizen of the United States; and
(2)] a resident of the State.
Article – Business Regulation
8–201.
There is a Maryland Home Improvement Commission in the Department.
8–202.
(b) Each member of the Commission shall have been a [citizen and] resident of
the State for at least 5 years before appointment.
9A–201.
There is a State Board of Heating, Ventilation, Air–Conditioning, and Refrigeration
Contractors in the Department.
9A–202.
(c) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) a citizen of the United States; and
(2)] a resident of the State.
Article – Correctional Services
4–207.
(a) There is a [Citizens] RESIDENTS Advisory Board.
(b) Based on recommendations of the Secretary, the Governor shall appoint the
members of the [Citizens] RESIDENTS Advisory Board.

SENATE BILL 490 9
(c) The [Citizens] RESIDENTS Advisory Board shall advise the Director and the
Secretary with respect to the operation and programs of the Institution.
10–401.
In this subtitle, “committee” means a [citizens’] RESIDENTS’ advisory committee
established under this subtitle.
10–402.
There is a [citizens’] RESIDENTS’ advisory committee for the State correctional
facilities located in or planned for location in each of the following areas:
(1) Baltimore City;
(2) Cumberland;
(3) Hagerstown;
(4) Jessup; and
(5) Somerset County.
Article – Criminal Law
12–301.1.
(f) (1) There is a Maryland Amusement Game Advisory Committee.
(3) The Advisory Committee consists of:
(i) the following members appointed by the Governor:
1. two members selected from a list of five names submitted
by the Maryland Amusement and Music Operators Association;
2. one member who is a local government official selected
from a list of names submitted by the Maryland Association of Counties and the Maryland
Municipal League;
3. one member who is a local law enforcement officer; and
4. one [citizen] representative WHO IS A PRIVATE
INDIVIDUAL; and
(ii) the Director of the Commission, or the Director’s designee, who
shall serve as a nonvoting member of the Advisory Committee.

SENATE BILL 490
Article – Economic Development
11–202.
There is a Maryland Military Installation Council.
11–203.
(a) The Council consists of the following members:
(1) three members selected by the President of the Senate of Maryland to
represent community interests, of which:
(i) one shall be a member of the Senate; and
(ii) two shall be [citizens] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS representing
communities adjacent to military installations;
(2) three members selected by the Speaker of the House of Delegates to
represent community interests, of which:
(i) one shall be a member of the House of Delegates; and
(ii) two shall be [citizens] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS representing
communities adjacent to military installations;
(3) the Secretary, or the designee of the Secretary;
(4) the Secretary of Transportation, or the designee of the Secretary of
Transportation;
(5) the Secretary of the Environment, or the designee of the Secretary of
the Environment;
(6) the Secretary of Planning, or the designee of the Secretary of Planning;
(7) the Secretary of Veterans and Military Families, or the designee of the
Secretary of Veterans and Military Families;
(8) the Secretary of Labor, or the designee of the Secretary of Labor;
(9) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the designee of the State
Superintendent;
(10) the Adjutant General of the Maryland National Guard, or the designee
of the Adjutant General;

SENATE BILL 490 11
(11) the President of the Southern Maryland Navy Alliance;
(12) the President of the Army Alliance;
(13) the President of the Military Alliance Council of Charles County;
(14) the President of the Maritime Technology Alliance;
(15) the President of the Fort Detrick Alliance;
(16) the President of the Fort Meade Alliance;
(17) the President of the Andrews Business and Community Alliance; and
(18) six members selected by the Governor, of which at least one is a spouse
of a service member.
Article – Environment
5–1102.1.
(a) (1) The Governor shall appoint a Cox Creek [Citizens] RESIDENTS
Oversight Committee.
5–1104.
(a) (1) With the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint
a Hart–Miller–Pleasure Island [Citizens] RESIDENTS Oversight Committee.
(b) The Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following members:
(1) 2 trustees from the grantee in interest, as defined in § 5–1202.2(a)(1) of
the Natural Resources Article;
(2) 1 individual from the North Point Peninsula Community Coordinating
Council;
(3) 1 individual from the Essex Middle River Civic Council, Inc.;
(4) 2 interested [citizens] RESIDENTS, 1 of whom shall reside in the sixth
legislative district, and 1 of whom shall reside in the seventh legislative district;
(5) 1 individual from the Baltimore County Waterman’s Association;
(6) 1 individual who represents the pleasure boating industry in Baltimore
County;

SENATE BILL 490
(7) 1 individual who represents the sport fishing or crabbing industry in
Baltimore County;
(8) 1 individual from the Greater Dundalk Community Council; and
(9) 1 individual from the Hart and Miller Island Area Environmental
Group, Inc.
5–1104.1.
(a) (1) Subject to the approval of the members of the General Assembly of the
36th legislative district, the Governor shall appoint a Kent Island [Citizens] RESIDENTS
Oversight Committee.
(b) The Oversight Committee shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The Secretary of the State Department of Natural Resources or the
Secretary’s designee;
(2) Two representatives of the Kent Island Civic Confederation;
(3) Two [citizens] RESIDENTS from the 4th election district;
(4) One representative of the Maryland Watermen’s Association;
(5) One representative of the Queen Anne’s County Watermen’s
Association;
(6) One representative of the pleasure boating industry;
(7) One representative of the sport boating industry;
(8) One representative from the Maryland Port Administration;
(9) One member of the Board of County Commissioners of Queen Anne’s
County or the Board’s designee; and
(10) One member of the Queen Anne’s County Delegation or the Delegation’s
designee.
Article – Family Law
5–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 490 13
(g) “Local board” means a local [citizen] RESIDENT board of review for children
in out–of–home care.
(l) “State Board” means the State [Citizens] RESIDENTS Review Board for
Children.
5–535.
There is a State [Citizens] RESIDENTS Review Board for Children.
5–539.
(b) The State Board shall:
(1) provide a training program for members of the local boards and local
[citizens] RESIDENTS review panels;
(2) review and coordinate the activities of the local boards;
(3) adopt policies and procedures that relate to reports and any other
information that is required for any public or private agency or institution;
(4) make recommendations to the Secretary of Human Services and the
General Assembly regarding:
(i) the response of the State to child abuse and neglect; and
(ii) out–of–home care policies, procedures, and practices; and
(5) report to the Secretary of Human Services and, subject to § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the General Assembly on the first day of each year on the
status of children in out–of–home placement in this State.
5–539.1.
(c) The State Board shall:
(1) provide for public outreach and comment; and
(2) make available to the public systemic findings and recommendations of
the State Board, the local [citizen] RESIDENT review panel, if any, and the local boards.
(d) The State Board may:
(1) by a majority vote of its members add up to four members with expertise
in the prevention and treatment of child abuse and neglect for the purpose of performing
its duties under this section; and

SENATE BILL 490
(2) to assist the State Board in its reviews of specific cases, designate:
(i) local teams composed of members of local boards of out–of–home
care of children and staff; or
(ii) local [citizens] RESIDENTS review panels established under §
5–539.2 of this subtitle.
(e) In consultation with local citizens review panels and the State Council on
Child Abuse and Neglect, the State Board shall develop protocols that govern the scope of
activities of local [citizens] RESIDENTS review panels to reflect the provisions of the federal
Child Abuse Prevention and Treatment Act (42 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.).
(f) The State Board shall coordinate its activities under this section with the
State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect, the State Child Fatality Review Team, local
[citizens] RESIDENTS review panels, and the local child fatality review teams in order to
avoid unnecessary duplication of effort.
5–539.2.
(a) (1) A local government may establish a local [citizens] RESIDENTS review
panel to assist and advise the State Board and the State Council on Child Abuse and
Neglect.
(2) Two or more counties may establish a multicounty local [citizens]
RESIDENTS review panel, in accordance with a memorandum of understanding executed
by the governing bodies of each participating county.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2) of this section, the members and chair
of a local [citizens] RESIDENTS review panel shall be appointed by the local governing
body.
(c) Membership on a local [citizens] RESIDENTS review panel shall be
representative of the local jurisdiction and include:
(1) individuals with expertise in the prevention and treatment of child
abuse and neglect, such as child advocates, volunteers of the court–appointed special
advocate program, attorneys who represent children, parent and consumer representatives,
law enforcement representatives, and health, human, and educational services
professionals; and
(2) one member from the local jurisdiction, who is appointed by the State
Board and one who is appointed by the State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect.
(d) (1) The term of a member is 4 years.

SENATE BILL 490 15
(2) At the end of a term, a member continues to serve until a successor is
appointed and qualifies.
(e) A local panel shall:
(1) evaluate the extent to which State and local agencies in that
jurisdiction are effectively fulfilling their responsibilities in accordance with the child
protection standards and the State plan under 42 U.S.C. § 5106a(b) and any other criteria
that the panel considers important for the protection of children;
(2) issue reports on its findings to the State Board and the State Council
on Child Abuse and Neglect; and
(3) carry out case reviews and other duties as requested to assist the State
Board and the State Council on Child Abuse and Neglect.
5–541.
(b) (2) Each member of a local board shall:
(i) be a [citizen] RESIDENT who has demonstrated an interest in
minor children through community service, professional experience, or similar activities;
or
(ii) have a background in law, sociology, psychology, psychiatry,
education, social work, or medicine.
5–544.
The goals of each local board are:
(1) as to minor children who reside in out–of–home care under the
jurisdiction of a local department, to conduct case reviews and individual child advocacy
activities in accordance with those case reviews under the protocols established by the State
Board;
(2) in cooperation with other local boards, if any, in the county, to make
recommendations regarding how the out–of–home care system may be improved;
(3) to coordinate its findings and recommendations under item (2) of this
section with a local [citizens] RESIDENTS review panel serving the county;
(4) to meet with the director of the local department and the judge in
charge of the juvenile court in the county to discuss the board’s findings and
recommendations; and

SENATE BILL 490
(5) to assist the State Board in holding community forums as required in §
5–539.1 of this subtitle.
Article – General Provisions
4–1A–01.
There is a State Public Information Act Compliance Board.
4–1A–02.
(a) (2) (iii) 1. Three members of the Board shall be private [citizens]
INDIVIDUALS AND RESIDENTS of the State.
2. A private [citizen] INDIVIDUAL member of the Board may
not be:
A. a custodian of a public record;
B. a member of the news media; or
C. a staff member or spokesperson for an organization that
represents the interests of custodians or applicants for public records.
7–317.
(a) The Governor may designate a [citizen] RESIDENT of the State as its Poet
Laureate.
Article – Health – General
7–510.
In Part II of this subtitle, “board” means a [citizens’] RESIDENTS’ advisory board for
a State residential center.
7–511.
There is a [citizens’] RESIDENTS’ advisory board for each State residential center.
10–410.
There is a [citizens’] RESIDENTS’ advisory board for each State facility.
10–411.

SENATE BILL 490 17
(b) Each member of a Board shall be a [citizen] RESIDENT of this State.
13–2102.
There is a State Traumatic Brain Injury Advisory Board.
13–2103.
The Advisory Board consists of the following 36 voting members:
(1) The following two members, who shall serve ex officio:
(i) One member of the Senate, to be appointed by the President of
the Senate; and
(ii) One member of the House of Delegates, to be appointed by the
Speaker of the House;
(2) The Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
(3) The Secretary of Health, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) The Secretary of Education, or the Secretary’s designee;
(5) One representative of the State Department of Education, Division of
Rehabilitation Services, appointed by the Director of the Division;
(6) One representative of the Maryland Department of Health,
Developmental Disabilities Administration, appointed by the Director of the
Administration;
(7) One representative of the Maryland Department of Health, Behavioral
Health Administration, appointed by the Director of the Administration;
(8) One representative of the Maryland Department of Health, Prevention
and Health Promotion Administration, Center for Chronic Disease Prevention and Control,
appointed by the Director of the Center;
(9) One representative of the Maryland Department of Health, Prevention
and Health Promotion Administration, Office for Genetics and People with Special Health
Care Needs, appointed by the Director of the Office;
(10) One representative of the Maryland Institute of Emergency Medical
Services Systems, appointed by the Director of the Institute;
(11) One representative of the Maryland Department of Health, Office of
Health Services, appointed by the Director of the Office;

SENATE BILL 490
(12) One representative of the Maryland Department of Health, Alcohol and
Drug Abuse Administration, appointed by the Director of the Administration;
(13) Four representatives of the Brain Injury Association of Maryland,
appointed by the Executive Director of the Association;
(14) One representative of the Maryland Statewide Independent Living
Council, appointed by the Executive Director of the Council;
(15) One representative of the Maryland Disability Law Center, Maryland’s
Protection Advocacy System, appointed by the Director of the Office;
(16) One representative of the National Institutes of Health, appointed by
the Director of the Institutes; and
(17) The following 16 members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) One representative of State or local law enforcement;
(ii) Six Maryland [citizens] RESIDENTS who have experienced a
traumatic brain injury;
(iii) Five Maryland [citizens] RESIDENTS who are currently caring
for, or are family members of, individuals who have experienced a traumatic brain injury;
and
(iv) Four professionals with specialized experience in providing
services to individuals with traumatic brain injuries or traumatic brain injury prevention
activities.
19–508.
There is a [citizens’] RESIDENTS’ advisory board for each center.
19–509.
(b) Each member of the board for a center SHALL BE:
(1) [Shall be a citizen of this State;
(2) Shall be a] A resident of a county that the center serves;
[(3)] (2) [Shall be representative] REPRESENTATIVE of the community;
and

SENATE BILL 490 19
[(4)] (3) [Shall be known] KNOWN for an interest in civic and public
affairs and for concern about the care of chronically ill individuals.
Article – Health Occupations
5–201.
There is a State Board of Dietetic Practice in the Department.
5–202.
(c) (1) Each licensed dietitian–nutritionist member of the Board shall:
(i) [Be a citizen of the United States;
(ii)] Be a resident of the State; and
[(iii)] (II) Have practiced dietetics for at least 5 of the last 10 years.
(2) The consumer member of the Board:
(i) [Shall be a citizen of the United States;
(ii)] Shall be a resident of this State;
[(iii)] (II) May not be a licensed dietitian–nutritionist or have a
household member who is a licensed dietitian–nutritionist;
[(iv)] (III) May not have a financial interest in the provision of goods
or services to licensed dietitian–nutritionists; and
[(v)] (IV) May not have a financial interest in the provision of
dietary goods or services to consumers.
8–201.
There is a State Board of Nursing in the Department.
8–202.
(c) Each member of the Board shall be[:
(1) A citizen of the United States; and
(2) A] A resident of this State.

SENATE BILL 490
9–201.
There is a State Board of Long–Term Care Administrators in the Department.
9–202.
(c) Each Board member shall[:
(1) Be a United States citizen or have declared an intent to become a
United States citizen; and
(2) Have] HAVE resided in this State for at least 1 year before appointment
to the Board.
18–201.
There is a State Board of Examiners of Psychologists in the Department.
18–202.
(b) Each psychologist member of the Board shall be:
(1) A licensed psychologist who has practiced, taught, or engaged in
research in psychology for at least 5 years; AND
[(2) A citizen of the United States; and
(3)] (2) A resident of this State.
20–201.
There is a State Board for Certification of Residential Child Care Program
Professionals in the Department.
20–202.
(c) Each Board member shall[:
(1) Be a United States citizen; and
(2) Have] HAVE resided in this State for at least 1 year before appointment
to the Board.
Article – Labor and Employment
9–301.

SENATE BILL 490 21
There is a State Workers’ Compensation Commission established as an independent
unit of the State government.
9–302.
(b) (2) Each member of the Commission shall:
(i) be a resident of the State;
(ii) [be a citizen and qualified voter of the State;
(iii)] have been admitted to practice law in the State; and
[(iv)] (III) be distinguished for integrity, sound legal knowledge, and
wisdom.
Article – Natural Resources
8–1803.
(a) There is a Critical Area Commission for the Chesapeake and Atlantic Coastal
Bays in the Department.
8–1804.
(a) (1) The Commission consists of 29 voting members who reflect the diversity
of the State and are appointed by the Governor, as follows:
(iii) 8 individuals, appointed with the advice and consent of the
Senate, who shall represent diverse interests, including underrepresented communities,
and among whom shall be a resident from each of the 5 counties that are listed and from
which an appointment has not been made under item (ii) of this paragraph and 3 of the 8
members appointed under this item shall be at large members, 1 of whom shall be a private
[citizen] INDIVIDUAL and resident of the Atlantic Coastal Bays Watershed; and
Article – Public Safety
1–401.
(a) There is a Sexual Offender Advisory Board.
(b) The Board consists of the following members:
(10) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(vii) two [citizen] members WHO ARE PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS.

SENATE BILL 490
3–202.
There is a Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission, which is an
independent commission that functions in the Department.
3–203.
(a) The Commission consists of the following members:
(12) the following individuals, appointed by the Governor with the advice
and consent of the Senate:
(v) three [citizens] RESIDENTS of the State who represent different
geographic areas of the State and do not have relationships to law enforcement.
Article – State Government
9–1E–15.
(a) There is a Sports Wagering Application Review Commission.
(c) A member of the Sports Wagering Application Review Commission:
(1) shall be at least 21 years old;
(2) [shall be a citizen of the United States;
(3)] shall be a resident of the State;
[(4)] (3) shall be knowledgeable and experienced in fiscal matters and
shall have at least 10 years of substantial experience:
(i) as an executive with fiduciary responsibilities in charge of a large
organization or foundation;
(ii) in an academic field relating to finance or economics; or
(iii) as an economist, a financial analyst, or an accountant, or as a
professional in a similar profession relating to fiscal matters or economics;
[(5)] (4) may not have been convicted of or granted probation before
judgment for a serious crime or a crime that involves gambling or moral turpitude;
[(6)] (5) may not have an official relationship to a person that is applying
for or holds a license under this subtitle or Subtitle 1D of this title;

SENATE BILL 490 23
[(7)] (6) may not have any direct or indirect financial interest, ownership,
or management, including holding any stocks, bonds, or other similar financial interests in
any gaming activities, including horse racing, video lottery terminals, fantasy competitions,
or lottery;
[(8)] (7) may not receive or share in, directly or indirectly, the receipts or
proceeds of any gaming activities, including horse racing or lottery;
[(9)] (8) may not have a beneficial interest in any contract for the
manufacture or sale of gaming devices, the conduct of any gaming activity, or the provision
of any independent consulting services in connection with any gaming establishment or
gaming activity;
[(10)] (9) may not be an elected official of State or local government; and
[(11)] (10) shall file a financial disclosure statement with the State Ethics
Commission in accordance with Title 15, Subtitle 6 of this article.
9–2404.
(a) There is a Maryland Advisory Council on the Deaf and Hard of Hearing.
(c) Of the 18 Council members:
(10) nine shall be from the general public.
(d) (2) Of the nine members from the general public:
(i) five shall be deaf and hard of hearing individuals;
(ii) one shall be a private [citizen] INDIVIDUAL with special
knowledge or expertise relating to services to deaf and hard of hearing individuals;
(iii) one shall be a parent of a deaf or hard of hearing child;
(iv) one shall be from a private agency providing services to deaf and
hard of hearing individuals; and
(v) one shall be a person with special knowledge or expertise relating
to services to individuals who are deafblind.
10–1702.
(A) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:

SENATE BILL 490
(1) A STANDING COMMITTEE, AS DEFINED IN § 2–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE; OR
(2) A COMMITTEE ESTABLISHED UNDER TITLE 2 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF ANY BOARD,
COMMITTEE, COMMISSION, TASK FORCE, OR WORKGROUP CREATED BY STATE LAW
SHALL REFLECT THE FULL DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
Article – Transportation
2–606.
(a) The Governor shall appoint a Bicycle and Pedestrian Advisory Committee to
provide guidance to State agencies concerning:
(1) Funding of bicycle and pedestrian related programs;
(2) Public education and awareness of bicycling and pedestrian related
activities;
(3) Public education and awareness of bicycling and pedestrian safety; and
(4) Any other issue directly related to bicycling and pedestrians.
(b) The Committee shall consist of the following:
(1) One representative each from:
(i) The Department of Transportation;
(ii) The Department of Natural Resources;
(iii) The State Department of Education;
(iv) The Department of State Police;
(v) The Department of Commerce;
(vi) The Maryland Department of Health;
(vii) The Department of Planning;
(viii) The Department of Disabilities; and

SENATE BILL 490 25
(ix) The Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning
Commission;
(2) One [citizen member] PRIVATE INDIVIDUAL from each of the following
areas:
(i) The Eastern Shore;
(ii) Western Maryland; and
(iii) Southern Maryland;
(3) Two [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS from each of the
following areas:
(i) The Baltimore metropolitan area; and
(ii) The Washington metropolitan area; and
(4) Up to six [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS selected to
represent the interests of bicyclists, pedestrians, and the disabled community to include:
(i) A representative of individuals who are visually impaired; and
(ii) A representative of individuals who are mobility impaired.
(c) One of the [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS selected under
subsection (b) of this section shall have an expertise in bicycle and pedestrian safety.
4–212.
(b) There is a Chesapeake Bay Bridge Reconstruction Advisory Group in the
Department.
(c) The Advisory Group consists of the following members:
(1) The Secretary of Transportation, or the Secretary’s designee;
(2) The State Highway Administrator, or the Administrator’s designee;
(3) The Executive Director of the Authority, or the Executive Director’s
designee;
(4) Two [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS appointed by the Anne
Arundel County Council;

SENATE BILL 490
(5) Two [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS appointed by the
County Commissioners of Queen Anne’s County; and
(6) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) Three [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS who live in
Anne Arundel County and are familiar with issues faced by commuters who cross the
Chesapeake Bay Bridge; and
(ii) Three [citizen members] PRIVATE INDIVIDUALS who live in
Queen Anne’s County and are familiar with issues faced by commuters who cross the
Chesapeake Bay Bridge.
5–201.
(a) There is a Maryland Aviation Commission.
(b) The Commission shall:
(6) In carrying out the provisions of this subtitle:
(i) Consider information and advice from:
1. The air carrier industry;
2. The airport concessionaire industry;
3. The airline support services industry;
4. [Citizen] RESIDENT advisory groups;
5. Airport employees or their representatives;
6. Local government;
7. [Citizens] RESIDENTS from communities near airports;
and
8. Other Maryland communities that have, or are predicted
to have, potentially adverse health or community impacts from airport infrastructure and
economic growth decisions; and
(ii) Consider the aviation, economic, business, environmental,
health, and community–related impacts or any other impacts the Commission finds
relevant to the decisions of the Commission or the Administration.

SENATE BILL 490 27
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.